ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 겨울 스포츠/액티비티 > 스키/스노보드 > 스키 바인딩 부품: 스키 바인딩 브레이크; 스키 바인딩 크램폰; 스키 바인딩 플레이트; 스키 바인딩 나사 및 장착 하드웨어; 스키 바인딩 스트랩
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Winter Sports & Activities > Skiing & Snowboarding > Ski Binding Parts: Ski Binding Brakes; Ski Binding Crampons; Ski Binding Plates; Ski Binding Screws & Mounting Hardware; Ski Binding Straps
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Wintersport & -Aktivitäten > Skisport & Snowboarden > Ersatzteile für Skibindungen: Skistopper; Harscheisen für Skibindungen; Skibindungsplatten; Schrauben & Befestigungsmaterial für Skibindungen; Skibindungsgurte
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Zimné športy a aktivity > Lyžovanie a snowboarding > Diely lyžiarskeho viazania: Brzdy lyžiarskych viazaní; Lyžiarske viazanie a mačky; Dosky na lyžiarske viazanie; Skrutky a montážne prvky pre lyžiarske viazania; Popruhy na lyžiarske viazanie
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Actividades y deportes de invierno > Esquí y snowboard > Piezas de fijación de esquís: Frenos para fijaciones de esquí; Crampones para fijaciones de esquí; Placas para fijaciones de esquí; Tornillos y accesorios de montaje para fijaciones de esquí; Correas de fijación de esquí
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og aktiviteter > Ski- og snowboardutstyr > Skibindingsdeler: Skistoppere; Skarejern for skibindinger; Bindingsplater for ski; Skruer og monteringsutstyr for skibindinger; Skibindingsstropper
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Χειμερινά αθλήματα & δραστηριότητες > Σκι & σνόουμπορντ > Εξαρτήματα δεσίματος σκι: Φρένα για δέστρες σκι; Κραμπόν για δέστρες σκι; Πλάκες για δέστρες σκι; Βίδες και υλικός εξοπλισμός τοποθέτησης για δέστρες σκι; Λουριά δεσίματος σκι
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Atividades e desportos de inverno > Esqui e snowboard > Peças para fixadores de esqui: Travões para fixações de ski; Crampons para fixações de ski; Placas para fixações de ski; Parafusos e equipamento de montagem para fixações de ski; Faixas de fixação para esqui
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Talviurheilu ja -harrastukset > Hiihto ja lumilautailu > Suksisiteiden osat: Suksien siteiden jarrut; Suksien siteiden jääraudat; Suksien siteiden asennuslevyt; Suksien siteiden ruuvit ja asennustarvikkeet; Suksisiteiden hihnat
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Vintersporter och -aktiviteter > Skid- och snowboardåkning > Delar till skidbindning: Skistoppers för skidbindningar; Skarjärn för skidbindningar; Monteringsplattor för skidbindningar; Skruvar och monteringsdetaljer för skidbindningar; Skidbindningsremmar
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウィンタースポーツ > スキー・スノーボード用品 > スキー用ビンディングパーツ: スキービンディング用ブレーキ; スキービンディング用クランポン; スキービンディング用プレート; スキービンディング用ネジ・取り付け金具; スキー用ビンディングストラップ
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 冬季运动与活动 > 滑雪与单板滑雪 > 滑雪固定装置部件: 滑雪固定器止滑器; 滑雪固定器冰爪; 滑雪固定器垫板; 滑雪固定器螺丝和安装硬件; 滑雪板固定绑带
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาและกิจกรรมในฤดูหนาว > สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด > ชิ้นส่วนตัวล็อกรองเท้าสกี: เบรกไบดิ้งสกี; แครมปอนสำหรับไบดิ้งสกี; แผ่นเพลตไบดิ้งสกี; สกรูและฮาร์ดแวร์ติดตั้งไบดิ้งสกี; สายล็อกรองเท้าสกี
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Hoạt động và thể thao mùa đông > Trượt tuyết băng đồng và trượt ván trên tuyết > Phụ tùng đế kẹp: Phanh cho ngàm gắn giày trượt tuyết; Đế đinh cho ngàm gắn giày trượt tuyết; Tấm lót ngàm gắn giày trượt tuyết; Ốc vít và phụ kiện lắp ngàm gắn giày trượt tuyết; Dây gắn ski
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Зимние виды спорта и игры > Лыжный спорт и сноубординг > Детали креплений для лыж: Скистопы для лыжных креплений; Кошки для лыжных креплений; Платформы для лыжных креплений; Винты и крепежные элементы для лыжных креплений; Ремешки для креплений лыж
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Activități și sporturi de iarnă > Schi și snowboarding > Piese legături pentru schiuri: Frâne pentru legături de schi; Crampoane pentru legături de schi; Plăci pentru legături de schi; Șuruburi și accesorii de montare pentru legăturile de schi; Curele pentru legături schiuri
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 冬季運動 > 單/雙板滑雪 > 滑雪縛靴帶零件: 雙板滑雪板固定器煞車; 雙板滑雪板固定器冰爪; 雙板滑雪板固定器墊板; 雙板滑雪板固定器螺絲與安裝配件; 滑雪縛靴帶
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą > Jazda na nartach i snowboardzie > Mocowania do nart: Skistopery do wiązań narciarskich; Harszle do wiązań narciarskich; Płyty do wiązań narciarskich; Śruby i elementy montażowe do wiązań narciarskich; Paski do nart
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Zimski sportovi i aktivnosti > Skijanje i snowboardanje > Dijelovi skijaških vezova: Kočnice za skijaški vez; Dereze za skijaški vez; Ploče za skijaški vez; Vijci i montažna oprema za skijaški vez; Trake za zaštitu vezova
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri > Kayak ve Snowboard > Kayak Bağlama Parçaları: Kayak bağlaması frenleri; Kayak bağlaması kramponları; Kayak bağlaması plakaları; Kayak bağlaması vidaları ve montaj donanımları; Kayak Bağlama Askıları
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Wintersport en -activiteiten > Skiën en snowboarden > Onderdelen van skibindingen: Skistoppers; Skistijgijzers; Skibindingsplaten; Schroeven en bevestigingsmateriaal voor skibindingen; Bandjes van skibindingen
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport e attività invernali > Sci e snowboard > Componenti per attacchi da sci: Freni per attacchi da sci; Rampanti per attacchi da sci; Piastre per attacchi da sci; Viti e minuteria di montaggio per attacchi da sci; Cinghie per attacchi da sci
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Téli sportok és tevékenységek > Síelés és snowboardozás > Síléckötő alkatrészek: Sífékek; Síhágóvasak; Síkötés-alaplapok; Síkötéscsavarok és rögzítőelemek; Síléckötő pántok
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og -aktiviteter > Ski og snowboard > Dele til skibindinger: Skistoppere; Skarejern til skibindinger; Monteringsplader til skibindinger; Skruer og monteringshardware til skibindinger; Stropper til skibindinger
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Зимни спортове и дейности > Каране на ски и сноуборд > Части за ски автомати: Спирачки за ски автомати; Котки за ски автомати; Монтажни плочи за ски автомати; Винтове и монтажни части за ски връзки; Каишки за ски автомати
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zimní sporty a aktivity > Lyžování a snowboarding > Součástky lyžařského vázání: Brzdy lyžařských vázání; Stoupací železa na lyžařská vázání; Podložky pod lyžařská vázání; Šrouby a montážní kování pro lyžařská vázání; Pásky na stáhnutí lyží
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Zimski športi in dejavnosti > Smučanje in deskanje na snegu > Deli za smučarske vezi: Zavore za smučarske vezi; Dereze za smučarske vezi; Plošče za smučarske vezi; Vijaki in montažni deli za smučarske vezi; Trakovi za smučarske vezi
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes e atividades de inverno > Esqui e snowboarding > Peças de amarração para ski: Freios para fixações de esqui; Crampons para fixações de esqui; Placas para fixações de esqui; Parafusos e ferragens de montagem para fixações de esqui; Tiras de amarração para ski
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Activités et sports d'hiver > Ski et snowboard > Pièces de fixations pour skis: Stop-skis pour fixations de ski; Couteaux pour fixations de ski; Plaques pour fixations de ski; Vis et matériel de montage pour fixations de ski; Sangles de fixation pour skis
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žiemos sportas ir veikla > Slidinėjimas ir snieglenčių sportas > Slidžių apkaustų dalys: Slidžių tvirtinimų stabdžiai; Slidžių tvirtinimų grandys; Slidžių tvirtinimų plokštės; Slidžių apkaustų varžtai ir tvirtinimo detalės; Slidžių apkaustų dirželiai